Washington statutes.
RCW 18.321.040

Issuance of a multistate license.

(1) Upon receipt of an application for a multistate license, the home state licensing authority shall determine the applicant's eligibility for a multistate license in accordance with RCW 18.321.030.

(2) If such applicant is eligible pursuant to RCW 18.321.030, the home state licensing authority shall issue a multistate license that authorizes the applicant or regulated social worker to practice in all member states under a multistate authorization to practice.

(3) Upon issuance of a multistate license, the home state licensing authority shall designate whether the regulated social worker holds a multistate license in the bachelor's, master's, or clinical category of social work.

(4) A multistate license issued by a home state to a resident in that state shall be recognized by all compact member states as authorizing social work practice under a multistate authorization to practice corresponding to each category of licensure regulated in each member state.

[ 2024 c 176 s 6.]

NOTES:

Intent—2024 c 176: See note following RCW 18.321.005.